Hawaii statutes.
[§801D-7] Televised testimony.
Victims and witnesses shall have the right to testify at trial by televised
two-way closed circuit video to be viewed by the court, the accused, and the
trier of fact. [L 1997, c 320, §2]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next